Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 5. Solid Waste Management
§ 35-11-511.
Automotive battery retailers required to post notice; penalty.

The department shall produce, print and distribute the notices required by W.S.

35-11-510

to all places where lead acid batteries are offered for sale at retail. Failure to post the required notice shall subject the establishment to a fine of one hundred dollars ($100.00).

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 78, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

35-11-506

.

Cross references. —

As to creation of state department of environmental quality, see §

35-11-104

.

Editor's notes. —

This section was enacted as §

35-11-506

. As Laws 1989, ch. 148, also enacted a §

35-11-506

, this section has been renumbered as §

35-11-511

.

§ 35-11-512.
Lead acid battery wholesalers.

Any person selling new lead acid batteries at wholesale shall accept, at the point of transfer, in a quantity at least equal to the number of new batteries purchased per year, used lead acid batteries from customers, if offered by customers. A person accepting batteries in transfer from an automotive battery retailer shall be allowed a period not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days to remove batteries from the retail point of collection.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 78, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

35-11-507

.

Editor's notes. —

This section was enacted as §

35-11-507

. As Laws 1989, ch. 148, also enacted a §

35-11-507

, this section has been renumbered as §

35-11-512

.

§ 35-11-513.
Penalties.

Violations of W.S.

35-11-510

and

35-11-512

are misdemeanors subject to a penalty of up to seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 78, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

35-11-508

.

Editor's notes. —

This section was enacted as §

35-11-508

. As Laws 1989, ch. 205, enacted a §

35-11-504

, which was renumbered as §

35-11-508

(see § 35-11-508 and notes thereto), this section has been renumbered as §

35-11-513

.

§ 35-11-514.
Approval of commercial solid waste management, commercial incineration and disposal facilities.

No construction shall commence of, nor shall any wastes be accepted or received at, any commercial solid waste management facility, or any commercial waste incineration or disposal facility subject to regulation under W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii) unless the facility has been approved by resolution of the board of county commissioners of the county where the proposed facility is to be located. The county commissioners shall hold one (1) or more public hearings before making their decision. The county commissioners shall publish notice of each hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the area of the proposed facility once each week for at least two (2) consecutive weeks prior to the hearing. The board of county commissioners may authorize a proposed facility upon considering that the facility:

Is necessary and meets industrial, socioeconomic or municipal needs for additional capacity to manage wastes;

Reduces industry or municipal reliance on waste management methods which would be less suitable for the protection of the environment or public health than would be possible by the proposed facility; and

Employs the best available technology to protect public health, safety and the environment, and is located so as to ensure maximum protection of public health, safety and the environment as compared to other alternative methods and locations.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as exempting any commercial solid waste management facility, or any commercial waste incineration or disposal facility from any other provision of this act or the Industrial Development and Information Siting Act [chapter 12 of this title].

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 68, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b), see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-515.
Account created for the guarantee of costs for closure and post-closure care for municipally owned or operated solid waste disposal facilities.

There is created an expendable trust account to provide a guarantee that adequate monies will be available to close and conduct post-closure monitoring at municipal solid waste disposal facilities, in compliance with the requirements of this article and applicable federal law. Monies shall be paid into and from the account in accordance with this section. Interest earned on investments from the account shall be credited back to the account.

Any municipal solid waste disposal facility shall be eligible to participate in the account but shall not be required to participate. Participating facilities shall be eligible for the guarantees provided in subsection (c) of this section. Nonparticipating facilities shall not be eligible for the guarantees provided in subsection (c) of this section. Nonparticipating facilities may either separately or together, take necessary action to comply with state or federal closure and post-closure regulations.

Participating facilities are exempt from any requirement under W.S. 35-11-504(c) pertaining to financial assurance requirements for closure and post-closure care of municipal solid waste disposal facilities. The state hereby guarantees, for purposes of compliance with subtitle D of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, P.L. 94-580 [42 U.S.C. § 6941 et seq.], and W.S. 35-11-504(a)(i), that the closure and post-closure care requirements of participating facilities will be satisfied by the provisions of this section.

Each participating facility shall:

Once every four (4) years prepare a closure and post-closure cost estimate in accord with rules of the council; or

Agree to use a standard closure and post-closure cost estimate prepared by the director.

Each participating facility shall once every four (4) years calculate the remaining usable solid waste disposal capacity available at the facility, expressed in years. The procedures for calculating remaining capacity shall be prescribed by the director, after consultation with representatives of the participating facilities.

Each participating facility shall pay annually into the account a premium, the sum of which at facility closure will equal no less than three percent (3%) of the sum of the closure and post-closure costs estimates specified in subsection (d) of this section.

At any time following the proper certification of facility closure in compliance with rules of the council, a participating facility owner may apply to the director to receive a refund of the closure guarantee costs which have been paid into the account on behalf of the facility.

At any time following the proper certification of the conclusion of the post-closure period in compliance with rules of the council, a participating facility owner may apply to the director to receive a refund of the post-closure guarantee costs which have been paid into the account on behalf of the facility.

The council is authorized to adopt rules governing payment requirements, expenditures from the account, notifications by owners, disclosures of information, and any other administrative matter associated with the account. Rules of the council shall prescribe that participating facilities electing to cease participating in the account, or applying for refunds under subsection (g) or (h) of this section, shall be entitled to a refund limited to ninety percent (90%) of the actual contribution paid by the facility, less any expenditures paid from the account on behalf of the facility which have not been recovered under subsection (m) of this section.

The director shall use the account to perform closure or post-closure maintenance activities at any participating facility, if the facility owner is unable to carry out those responsibilities. The director, subject to appeal to the council, shall determine the amounts of any expenditures from the account.

The attorney general shall file suit to recover any funds expended under subsection (k) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall relieve any owner or operator of a solid waste management facility of the requirement to comply with applicable closure or post-closure requirements of this act. No third party cause of action is created by this section. Existence of the account does not limit the liability of any owner of a municipal solid waste disposal facility for damages or costs which may occur as the result of any failure to close, or conduct post-closure maintenance, in compliance with this act.

For the purpose of this section:

“Account” means the account created by subsection (a) of this section;

“Municipal solid waste disposal facility” means a solid waste landfill or land disposal facility which is owned or operated by a municipality and which receives any solid wastes, including garbage, trash and sanitary waste in septic tanks, derived from households and nonhazardous industrial waste;

“Participating facility” means a municipal solid waste disposal facility which elects to participate and is participating in the account in accordance with the requirements of this section.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 114, § 1; 1994, ch. 36, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the trust and agency fund” in (a).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Resource Conservation and Recovery Act. —

Subtitle D of the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, referred to in the second sentence in subsection (c), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 6941 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 35-11-516.
Regulation of hazardous waste generators and transporters.

Each person who generates or transports hazardous waste in an amount which would otherwise subject the person to regulation under subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, P.L. 94-580 [42 U.S.C. § 6921 et seq.], shall comply with the following requirements:

Each generator shall:

Keep adequate records of quantities, composition and disposition of the hazardous waste generated;

Adequately label any containers used for the storage, transport or disposal of hazardous waste;

Use appropriate containers for hazardous waste;

Furnish information as may be required on the general chemical composition and hazardous properties of hazardous waste to persons transporting, treating, storing or disposing the waste;

Use the national hazardous waste shipping manifest system, and employ any other reasonable means to assure that the hazardous waste generated is shipped to and arrives at the designated, authorized hazardous waste treatment, storage or disposal facility;

Submit reports to the department at least once every two (2) years setting out:

The quantities and nature of hazardous waste generated during the year;

The disposition of all hazardous waste reported under this subsection;

The efforts undertaken during the year to reduce the volume and hazardous characteristics of hazardous waste generated; and

The changes in volume and hazardous characteristics of waste actually achieved during the year reported in comparison with previous years.

Certify, on the shipping manifest required under this subsection, that:

The generator of the hazardous waste has a program in place to reduce the volume or quantity and hazardous characteristics of the waste to the degree determined by the generator to be economically practicable; and

The proposed method of treatment, storage or disposal is that practicable method currently available to the generator that satisfies current regulatory requirements and which minimizes the present and future threat to human health and the environment.

Each transporter shall:

Keep adequate records of hazardous waste transported, its source and delivery points;

Transport hazardous waste only if it is properly labeled and manifested; and

Transport hazardous waste only to the hazardous waste treatment, storage or disposal facility which the shipper designates on the manifest form, to be a facility holding a permit issued by the United States environmental protection agency, an authorized state or the department.

The council shall, upon recommendation from the director, promulgate rules and regulations to implement the requirements of this section applicable to generators and transporters of hazardous waste, and to fuels produced from hazardous waste and mixtures of hazardous waste and other materials. The rules shall be no more and no less stringent than corresponding rules which have been adopted by the United States environmental protection agency to implement sections 3002 and 3003 of subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act. [42 U.S.C. § 6921 et seq.].

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 82, § 1.

Resource Conservation and Recovery Act. —

Subtitle C of the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a) and in the second sentence in subsection (b), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 6921 et seq.

§ 35-11-517.
Fees applicable to hazardous waste treatment, storage and disposal facility operators.

The department shall implement a permit fee system and schedule of fees which are applicable to hazardous waste treatment, storage and disposal facilities.

Permit fees shall be collected from applicants for permits for any facility subject to subsection (a) of this section, and annually from those existing facilities for the duration of the operating, closure and post-closure permit period. The fees for applicants for permits and the annual fees for inspection and enforcement shall be based on the facility type and size. The department shall develop a fee structure which, to the extent feasible, equitably apportions the department’s estimated costs of implementing the requirements of this act applicable to the facilities, which is based on measurable goals, and which is sufficient to recover the amount reviewed by the joint appropriations interim committee and appropriated by the legislature for implementing the hazardous waste treatment, storage and disposal permitting program. The fee amount shall be sufficient to provide adequate enforcement of compliance with the hazardous waste requirements of this act, as required in section 3006(b) of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, 42 U.S.C. 6926(b). The department shall prepare a biennium report for review by the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee by October 31 of the year prior to the Wyoming legislative budget session.

Fees shall cover all reasonable direct and indirect costs including the costs of:

Reviewing and acting upon any permit application, including applications for major permit amendments;

Implementing and enforcing permits; and

Carrying out permit and inspection-related functions performed by the department.

The fees collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a separate account, and shall be subject to appropriation by the legislature to the department solely for permitting, conducting inspections under and enforcing the requirements of this act governing facilities subject to subsection (a) of this section.

The department shall give written notice of the amount of the fee to be assessed and the basis for the assessment to the facility owner. The owner may appeal the assessment to the council within forty-five (45) days after receipt of the written notice. The appeal shall be based only upon the allegation that the particular assessment is erroneous or excessive and shall not be based upon the entire fee schedule adopted under this section. The contested case procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall apply to any appeal under this subsection.

If any part of the assessment is not appealed it shall be paid to the department upon receipt of the written notice.

The department in developing a fee schedule shall take into account the financial resources of small businesses as defined by the United States small business administration.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or modify any requirement of W.S. 35-11-503(b) with respect to fees for commercial radioactive waste management facility permits.

This section shall not become effective until authorization of a state program pursuant to subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, P.L. 94-580. [42 U.S.C. § 6921 et seq.].

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” in (d).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Resource Conservation and Recovery Act. —

Subtitle C of the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, referred to in subsection (j), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 6921 et seq.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 35-11-518.
Prior federal court orders and administrative orders.

The department may become a party to, or assume the rights and duties of the federal government for, any federal court order which has been issued pursuant to subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, P.L. 94-580 [42 U.S.C. § 6921 et seq.], prior to the effective date of the authorization of the state hazardous waste program under that subtitle. Any person subject to a prior federal court order issued pursuant to subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, shall not be subject to any additional, conflicting or more restrictive remedial or corrective action order or requirement under this act with respect to the hazardous waste management unit, solid waste management unit or area of concern that is the subject of the federal court order, unless required to comply with new requirements adopted under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act. If the department becomes a party to, or assumes the rights and duties of the federal government for, any prior federal court order, the department shall be governed by, and subject to, the dispute resolution procedures of the federal court which retains jurisdiction for the order and may, within those procedures and under the law governing the federal order, seek any remedy, change, amendment or other relief relating to the order.

The department may issue an administrative order which is equivalent to any federal administrative order which has been issued pursuant to subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, prior to the effective date of the authorization of the state hazardous waste program under that subtitle. The limitations regarding stringency contained in subsection (a) of this section apply to orders issued under this subsection. Following the issuance of any order under this subsection, any disputes concerning implementation of the order shall be resolved by appeal to the council as provided by this act. Any person aggrieved or adversely affected in fact by a final decision of the council is entitled to judicial review in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 82, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Resource Conservation and Recovery Act. —

The federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, referred to in this section, appears as 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 35-11-519.
Hazardous waste corrective action requirements.

Corrective action requirements applicable to any hazardous waste management facility shall be consistent with, and equivalent to, corrective action requirements contained in rules and regulations adopted by the United States environmental protection agency under authority of subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, P.L. 94-580 [42 U.S.C. § 6921 et seq.], as amended by the hazardous and solid waste amendments of 1984, P.L. 98-616, and as they may be hereafter amended.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 82, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions of an act for voluntary remediation of contaminated sites, see article 16 of this chapter.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 3, repealed Laws 1999, ch. 204, § 1, which had amended this section effective July 1, 2001, by adding (b) through (g), redesignating the existing provisions as (a), and inserting “which came into existence on or after July 1, 1973” following “waste management facility” in (a).

Resource Conservation and Recovery Act. —

The federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, referred to in this section, appears as 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq.

§ 35-11-520.
Termination of state regulation of hazardous waste generators and transporters; procedures.

The department shall report to the legislature any reduction in federal hazardous waste grant funds supplied to the state under section 3011 of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (42 U.S.C. 6931), which results in the need for additional state funds, exclusive of fees under W.S.

35-11-517

, to administer W.S.

35-11-516

through

35-11-520

.

The provisions of W.S.

35-11-516

through

35-11-519

shall not be effective one hundred eighty (180) days after the adjournment of the legislative session next following the submission of a report under subsection (a) of this section, unless the legislature appropriates the additional funds required. The expiration of the state program pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to the following:

The annual fee collected by the department under W.S.

35-11-517

shall be remitted to the facility owner on a prorated basis upon termination of regulation by the state under this section;

The department shall vacate any order issued to any generator or transporter to enforce any provision of W.S.

35-11-516

through

35-11-519

;

The state attorney general may continue to prosecute any action based on alleged violations of W.S. 35-11-516 through 35-11-519 which was filed prior to the adjournment of the legislative session referred to in subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 82, § 1.

§ 35-11-521.
Grants for municipal solid waste landfill monitoring.

Subject to the availability of funds, the director shall provide grants toward the costs of performing activities specified in subsection (b) of this section to local governmental entities who own or are responsible for any municipal solid waste landfill, for any project where a work plan has been submitted to the department for work performed or initiated after July 1, 2005.

Grant funding under this section may be provided at existing or closed municipal solid waste landfills for the following activities:

Conducting surface or subsurface geophysical studies to determine proper monitor system placement and to provide an indication of the presence or absence of groundwater beneath and adjacent to the landfill;

Preparing plans for installation of systems to monitor or detect releases of subsurface pollutants from landfills;

Installing new monitor systems or upgrading existing monitor systems to meet standards for the systems established by the department under this article; and

Collecting and analyzing samples from monitor systems installed under paragraph (iii) of this subsection, for a period of time sufficient to determine if there have been releases of subsurface pollutants from the landfill for any landfill which ceased receipt of solid wastes before September 13, 1989.

Grants for eligible costs under subsection (b) of this section may be awarded:

For up to fifty percent (50%) of the eligible costs; or

For up to seventy-five percent (75%) of eligible costs for applicants meeting the following criteria:

Municipalities with a population of less than one thousand three hundred (1,300) or which are located within a county where the three (3) year average of the total local government share of state sales and use tax per capita is less than seventy percent (70%) of the statewide per capita average; or

Counties, solid waste disposal districts, joint powers boards, and special purpose districts located within a county with a total assessed valuation of less than two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the state’s total assessed valuation.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 101, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “according to the latest federal decennial census” following “one thousand three hundred (1,300)” in (c)(ii)(A).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 3, provides: “(a)
No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b)
No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 101, §§ 2, 3, 4 provide:

“Section 2.

There is appropriated from the general fund to the department of environmental quality seven million nine hundred seventy thousand dollars ($7,970,000.00) for the purpose of providing monitoring grants under this act. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-4-207(a), any unexpended funds appropriated under this section shall not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium.

“Section 3. “(a)

There is appropriated from the general fund to the department of environmental quality one million three hundred thousand dollars ($1,300,000.00) or as much thereof as is necessary for the purpose of providing planning grants to assist participating local governmental entities in the preparation of integrated solid waste management plans under W.S.

35-11-1902

. The department shall provide planning grants to local governmental entities pursuant to W.S.

35-11-1902

(c), subject to the appropriation amount as follows:

“(i)

An amount not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of estimated plan preparation costs shall be provided to the local governmental entity preparing an integrated solid waste management plan for a planning area encompassing a single local governmental entity;

“(ii)

An amount not to exceed seventy percent (70%) of estimated plan preparation costs shall be provided to the local governmental entity preparing an integrated solid waste management plan for a planning area encompassing two (2) local governmental entities;

“(iii)

An amount not to exceed ninety percent (90%) of estimated plan preparation costs shall be provided to the local governmental entity preparing an integrated solid waste management plan for a planning area encompassing three (3) or more local governmental entities.

“Section 4.

There are authorized two (2) additional full-time positions to the department of environmental quality for the purposes of implementing this act. There is appropriated from the general fund to the department of environmental quality three hundred twenty thousand five hundred dollars ($320,500.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to fund these two (2) positions. A request from the department of environmental quality shall be included in the 2009-2010 biennium standard budget request for purposes of continuing funding of this program and these positions.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 101, § 5(b), makes section 4 of the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006. Sections 2 and 3 of the act are effective July 1, 2006.

§ 35-11-522.
Grant criteria; submission and review of grant applications; recommendation from water and waste advisory board; grant awards.

Following public notice and hearing before the water and waste advisory board, the department shall adopt criteria for awarding grants under W.S.

35-11-521

.

When funds are available, applications for grants under W.S.

35-11-521

shall be submitted in a form approved by the department. The department shall review all grant applications, determine the eligibility of projects in accordance with W.S.

35-11-521

and provide recommendations for grant funding to the water and waste advisory board.

Following a public hearing, the water and waste advisory board shall provide recommendations for grant awards to the director.

The director shall award grants in consideration of recommendations provided by the water and waste advisory board.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 110, § 3.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 101, § 1; 2011, ch. 110, § 3.

The 2011 amendment,

repealed former (e), which read: “By June 30, 2010, the department shall evaluate all available groundwater monitor data from municipal solid waste disposal facilities and shall provide a report to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee describing the extent to which such facilities cause or contribute to pollution of groundwater. The report shall contain an estimate of the statewide groundwater remediation cost obligation faced by local governmental owners of such facilities and shall recommend one (1) or more means to fund those costs.”

Laws 2011, ch. 110, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 101, §§ 2, 3, 4 provides:

“Section 2. There is appropriated from the general fund to the department of environmental quality seven million nine hundred seventy thousand dollars ($7,970,000.00) for the purpose of providing monitoring grants under this act. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-4-207(a), any unexpended funds appropriated under this section shall not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium.

“Section 3. (a) There is appropriated from the general fund to the department of environmental quality one million three hundred thousand dollars ($1,300,000.00) or as much thereof as is necessary for the purpose of providing planning grants to assist participating local governmental entities in the preparation of integrated solid waste management plans under W.S.

35-11-1902

. The department shall provide planning grants to local governmental entities pursuant to W.S.

35-11-1902

(c), subject to the appropriation amount as follows:

“(i) An amount not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of estimated plan preparation costs shall be provided to the local governmental entity preparing an integrated solid waste management plan for a planning area encompassing a single local governmental entity;

“(ii) An amount not to exceed seventy percent (70%) of estimated plan preparation costs shall be provided to the local governmental entity preparing an integrated solid waste management plan for a planning area encompassing two (2) local governmental entities;

“(iii) An amount not to exceed ninety percent (90%) of estimated plan preparation costs shall be provided to the local governmental entity preparing an integrated solid waste management plan for a planning area encompassing three (3) or more local governmental entities.

“Section 4. There are authorized two (2) additional full-time positions to the department of environmental quality for the purposes of implementing this act. There is appropriated from the general fund to the department of environmental quality three hundred twenty thousand five hundred dollars ($320,500.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to fund these two (2) positions. A request from the department of environmental quality shall be included in the 2009 2010 biennium standard budget request for purposes of continuing funding of this program and these positions.”

Laws 2011, ch. 110, § 4, provides:

“Section 4. (a) Funds appropriated under 2006 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 101, not awarded or encumbered by the director for purposes of that act prior to June 30, 2011, shall be available to the department for the purposes of conducting priority assessments, evaluating high priority municipal solid waste landfills and refining clean-up cost estimates for those sites. These sites may include orphaned, abandoned, closed and operating landfills that have indications of more serious groundwater contamination as identified in the report submitted under W.S

35-11-522

.

“(b) To complete work under subsection (a) of this section, the amount the department may expend shall not exceed one million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,750,000.00) of the appropriation under 2006 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 101.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 101, § 5, makes sections 1 and 4 of the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006. Sections 2 and 3 are effective July 1, 2006.

§ 35-11-523.
Annual report.

Effective January 1, 2012, every operator shall file an annual report with the administrator on or within thirty (30) days prior to the anniversary date of each lifetime permit. The report shall include:

The facility name, the name and address of the operator and the permit number;

A report in such detail as the administrator shall require supplemented with maps, cross sections, aerial photographs, photographs or other material indicating:

The extent to which the landfill operations have been carried out;

The progress of all landfill work;

The extent to which regulatory requirements, expectations and predictions made in the original permit or any previous annual reports have been fulfilled, and any deviation there from, including but not limited to the capacity of landfill used, the results of any environmental monitoring, any remediation required or completed and the remaining usable municipal solid waste landfill capacity.

A revised schedule or timetable of landfill operations and an estimate of the available capacity to be affected during the next one (1) year period.

Upon receipt of the annual report the administrator shall make such further inquiry as deemed necessary. If the administrator objects to any part of the report or requires further information he shall notify the operator as soon as possible and shall allow a reasonable opportunity to provide the required information, or take such action as necessary to resolve the objection.

Within forty-five (45) days after the receipt of the annual report the administrator shall conduct an inspection of the landfill. A report of this inspection shall be made a part of the operator’s annual report and a copy shall be delivered to the operator.

Within sixty (60) days after receipt of the annual report, inspection report and other required materials, if the administrator finds the annual report in order and consistent with the landfill operation plan and solid waste management plan as set forth in the permit, or as amended to adjust to conditions encountered during landfill operations as provided by law, the director shall determine if any adjustment is necessary to the size of the bond required pursuant to W.S.

35-11-504

.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 110, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 110, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011

§ 35-11-524.
Municipal solid waste landfill assessments; priority list; monitoring.

The department shall conduct an assessment of the needs for municipal solid waste landfill monitoring and the necessity for any remediation on leaking municipal solid waste landfills in Wyoming.

The department shall establish a priority list for municipal solid waste landfills that need remediation. The criteria used to establish this priority list shall be developed and reviewed with the water and waste advisory board. The criteria shall include, but not be limited to the:

Type of leachate;

Volume of leachate;

Proximity of the leachate to the nearest surface or ground water;

Ability of the responsible municipality to remediate the contamination;

The nature of contaminants in surface or ground water affected by the municipal solid waste landfill, including whether a contaminant is naturally occurring or manmade; and

Maximum contaminant levels.

For high priority sites identified on the list established under subsection (b) of this section, the department shall work with the local managers of the high priority municipal solid waste landfills to gather data necessary for the report due under subsection (d) of this section.

The department shall submit to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee:

No later than December 31, 2012, an initial report describing an assessment of the clean-up costs at the high priority municipal solid waste landfills;

No later than June 30, 2013, and annually thereafter, a report including, but not limited to:

Monitoring results;

Remediation results;

The assessment of the clean-up costs at municipal solid waste landfills, including high, medium and low priority landfills;

Estimated high priority sites to be addressed in the coming year;

Orphan landfill sites information and data as required pursuant to W.S. 35-11-525(e).

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 110, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 110, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011